en: Dehydrated pumpkin soups
fr: Soupes au potiron déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirane juhe od bundeve
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su moliūgais

en: Reheatable green vegetables soups
fr: Soupes aux légumes verts
hr: Juhe od zelenog povrća koje se mogu podgrijati
lt: Pašildomos sriubos su žaliomis daržovėmis

en: Reheatable vegetables soups with cheese
fr: Soupes aux légumes avec fromage à réchauffer
hr: Juhe od povrća koje se mogu podgrijati sa sirom
lt: Pašildomos sriubos su daržovėmis ir sūriu

en: Dehydrated green vegetables soups
fr: Soupes aux légumes verts déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirane juhe od zelenog povrća
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su žaliomis daržovėmis

en: Asparagus soups
de: Spargelsuppen
fr: Soupes aux asperges
hr: Juhe od šparoga
lt: Sriubos su šparagais
nl: Aspergesoepen

en: Reheatable asparagus soups, Asparagus soups (reheatable)
fr: Soupe aux asperges à réchauffer
lt: Pašildomos sriubos su šparagais
nl: Aspergesoepen (opwarmbaar)

en: Cream of asparagus soups
es: Cremas de espárragos
fr: Veloutés d'asperges
hr: Krem juhe od šparoga
lt: Kreminės sriubos su šparagais
nl: Aspergecrèmesoepen

en: Dehydrated asparagus soups, Dehydrated asparagus soup
fr: Soupes aux asperges déshydratées
hr: Dehidrirana juha od šparoga
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su šparagais
nl: Aspergesoepen (oplos)

en: Onion soups
da: Løgsupper
fr: Soupes à l'oignon
hr: Juhe od luka
lt: Sriubos su svogūnais
nl: Uiensoepen
sv: Löksoppor

fr: Soupes à l'ortie
nl: Brandnetelsoepen

en: Heatable onion soup
fr: Soupe à l'oignon à réchauffer
hr: Podgrijana juha od luka
lt: Pašildomos svogūnų sriubos, Pašildomos sriubos su svogūnais

en: Dehydrated onion soup
fr: Soupe à l'oignon déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana juha od luka
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su svogūnais

en: Canned vegetable soups
de: Gemüsesuppenkonserven
es: Sopas de verduras y hortalizas en conserva, Sopas de verduras en conserva, Sopas de hortalizas en conserva, Sopas de verduras y hortalizas enlatadas, Sopas de verduras enlatadas, Sopas de hortalizas enlatadas
fi: purkitetut vihanneskeitot
fr: Soupes de légumes en conserve
hr: Konzervirane juhe od povrća
it: Zuppe di verdura in scatola
lt: Konservuotos sriubos su daržovėmis, Konservuotos daržovių sriubos
nl: Groentesoepen in blik/pot

en: Dehydrated vegetable soups
de: Gemüsesuppenpulver, Gemüse Tütensuppe
es: Sopas de verduras y hortalizas deshidratadas, Sopas de verduras deshidratadas, Sopas de hortalizas deshidratadas
fi: Kuivatut kasviskeitot
fr: Soupes de légumes déshydratées
he: מרקי ירקות מיובשים
hr: Dehidrirane juhe od povrća
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su daržovėmis
nl: Instant groentesoepen
pt: Sopas de vegetais desidratadas

en: Frozen vegetable soups
es: Sopas de verduras y hortalizas congeladas, Sopas de verduras congeladas, Sopas de hortalizas congeladas
fr: Soupes de légumes surgelées
hr: Smrznute juhe od povrća
lt: Šaldytos sriubos su daržovėmis
nl: Diepvriesgroentesoepen
ru: Замороженные овощные супы

en: Refrigerated vegetable soups
es: Sopas de verduras y hortalizas refrigeradas, Sopas de verduras refrigeradas, Sopas de hortalizas refrigeradas
fi: jäähdytetyt kasviskeitot
fr: Soupes de légumes réfrigérées
hr: Ohlađene juhe od povrća
lt: Šaltai laikomos sriubos su daržovėmis
nl: Gekoelde groentesoepen

en: Pistou soup, basil garlic and olive oil soup
fr: Soupes au pistou
hr: Pistou juha
lt: Sriubos su bazilikais ir česnakais ir alyvuogių aliejumi

en: Reheatable pistou soup, Reheatable basil garlic and olive oil soup
fr: Soupe au pistou à réchauffer
hr: Podgrijava pistou juha
lt: Pašildomos sriubos su bazilikais ir česnakais ir alyvuogių aliejumi

en: Dehydrated pistou soup, Dehydrated soup with basil garlic and olive oil
fr: Soupe au pistou déshydratée
hr: Dehidrirana pistou juha
lt: Greito paruošimo sriubos su bazilikais ir česnakais ir alyvuogių aliejumi

en: Fermented cereal soup
be: Kісяліца, Жур
cs: Kyselo
hr: Fermentirana juha od žitarica
pl: Żur, Żurek
sk: Kyslovka
uk: Жур